Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2406SV (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 428 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 483A.6C Muskellunge fishing fee. 1 Any person required to have a fishing license shall not fish 2 for or possess muskellunge unless that person has paid the 3 muskellunge fishing fee. The proceeds from the fee shall be 4 used exclusively for the muskellunge program designated by the 5 commission. The commission may grant a permit to a community 6 event in which muskellunge will be stocked in water that is not 7 designated muskellunge water and a person may catch and possess 8 muskellunge during the period and from the water covered by the 9 permit without having paid the muskellunge fishing fee. 10